src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON LASJOBL !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen:X8 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:X4 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc:X8 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
! +Sg+Ill:s%> NPxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8st%> NPxC ;
! +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Nom:^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:^DISIMPjd K ;
! +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:^DISIMPjd K ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
 +Pl+Ill:^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
! +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:^DISIMPjgujn K ;
! +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com:^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;

LEXICON HEAPMIOBL !!≈ * **@CODE@** sublexicon not only for caritives on -heapmi/-heapme
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X8 R ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X4 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X8 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X4 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X8 NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
! +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:s%> NPxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5jn%> NPxC ;
! +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X8 K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom:X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
! +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;

!LEXICON AGADJECT !Denominal Adj's with Deriv. -ag/og
! agat:agag BEAKKAN "aged A" ;


!! ## Adverbs from adjectives

LEXICON ADVV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** adverb from bilysll stems
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:Q7t K ;

LEXICON ADVC  !!≈ * **@CODE@** adverb from trilysll stems
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:it K ;




!! ## Adjectives from nouns

LEXICON AGAdj  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  mostly words like guovttejagat, allajoccat etc
:ag AGAdjINFL ;
+Err/Orth-a-á:ág AGAdjINFL ;

LEXICON AGAdjINFL !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Attr: K ;
! : VUOHTA ; pointer to VUOHTA in GAPPUS0
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 :%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Cmp/Attr:%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>iiddá%> NPx1V ;
