src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
3-lahtot+A+Sem/Dummytag:3-lahtog AGAdjINFL "membered A" ;
5-lahtot+A+Sem/Dummytag:5-lahtog AGAdjINFL "membered A" ;
5-uvssat+A+Sem/Dummytag:5-uvss AGAdj "doored A" ;
8-lahtot+A+Sem/Dummytag:8-lahtog AGAdjINFL "membered A" ;
A1B-soarttat+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Dummytag:A1B-soartt AGAdj ;
A5B-soarttat+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Dummytag:A5B-soartt AGAdj ;
O-soarttat+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Dummytag:O-soartt AGAdj ;
nanavarat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:nana#var AGAdj ;
alladásat+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:alla#das AGAdj ;
allavirggat+A+Sem/Dummytag:alla#virgg AGAdj ;
badjeljagaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:badjel#jagaž AGAdjINFL ;
golmmahearggat+A+Sem/Dummytag:golmma#hearggag AGAdjINFL ;
bastilisgaccat+A+Sem/Dummytag:bastilis#gacc AGAdj ;
artihkalvuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:artihkal#vu7đog AGAdjINFL ;
konvenšuvdnavuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:konvenšuvdna#vu7đog AGAdjINFL ;
groavvafuođarvuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:groavva#fuođar#vu7đog AGAdjINFL ;
diehtovuorkávuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:diehto#vuorká#vu7đog AGAdjINFL ;
birasguvllot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:biras#guvllog AGAdjINFL ;
boahttejagáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:boahtte#jagáž AGAdjINFL ;
boahtteáiggevuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:boahtte#áigge#vu7đog AGAdjINFL ;
lávdamállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:lávda#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
dondološmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:don#dološ#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
gámmemállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:gámme#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
sveitsamállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:sveitsa#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
nállemállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:nálle#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
kárášjohmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:káráš#joh9#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
boarrásitmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:boarrásit#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
boasttobealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:boastto#beal AGAdj ;
buorredáhtot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:buorre#dáhtog AGAdjINFL ;
buhtesváimmot+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:buhtis#váimmog AGAdjINFL ;
buotsoarttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:buot#soartt AGAdj ;
párrastávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:párra#stávval AGAdjINFL  ;
dakkárgeivnnat+A+Sem/Dummytag:dakkárge#ivnn AGAdj ;
diehtováillat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:diehto#váill AGAdj ;
diekkárlunddot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:diekkár#lu7nddog AGAdjINFL ;
dievasvarat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dievas#var AGAdj ;
doaibmavuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:doaibma#vuđog AGAdjINFL ;
dokkárhámat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dokkár#hám AGAdj ;
donmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:don#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
duoggevuovttat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duogge#vuovtt AGAdj ;
duokkárlunddot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duokkár#lu7nddog AGAdjINFL ;
máŋgganáittot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:máŋgga#náittog AGAdjINFL "cheeked A" ;
dáidhámat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dáid9#hám AGAdj ;
dákkármállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:dákkár#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
dássejuolggat+A+Sem/Dummytag:dásse#juolgg AGAdj ;
dássesiiddot+A+Err/Lex+Sem/Dummytag:dássi7#siiddog AGAdjINFL ;
earámearkkat+A+Sem/Dummytag:eará#mearkk AGAdj "marked A" ;
earámállet+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:eará% málleg AGAdjINFL ;
eatnatsorttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:eatnat#sortt AGAdj ;
ereliiggán+A+Sem/Dummytag:erelijggán AGAdjINFL ;
earenomáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:earenomáž AGAdjINFL ;
fiskesgaccat+A+Sem/Dummytag:fiskes#gacc AGAdj ;
fitnodatguvllot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:fitnodat#guvllog AGAdjINFL ;
gaitsoarttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:gait#soartt AGAdj ;
nuppelohsárggot+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuppe#loh9#sárggog AGAdjINFL ;
gassamuohtat+A+Sem/Plc:gassa#muoht AGAdj ;
lávkehámat+A+Sem/Dummytag:lávke#hám AGAdj ;
geangebealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:geange#beal AGAdj ;
geavaheaddjiguvllot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:geavaheaddji#guvllog AGAdjINFL ;
2-dávttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:2-dávtt AGAdj ;
goappatbealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:goappat#beal AGAdj ;
goappašsiiddot+A+Sem/Dummytag:goappaš#siiddog AGAdjINFL "sided A" ;
golmmaborat+A+Sem/Dummytag:golmma#bor AGAdj ;
golmmaoasat+A+Sem/Dummytag:golmma#oas AGAdj ;
máŋggastávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:máŋgga#stávval AGAdjINFL ;
greikkagielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:greikka#giel AGAdj ;
guhkessoajat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guhkes#soaj AGAdj "winged A" ;
guovttebiippot+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#biippog AGAdjINFL ;
guovtteborat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#bor AGAdj ;
guovtteguolmmat+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:guovtti7#guolmm AGAdj ;
guovttemiesat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#mies AGAdj ;
guovttesiffar+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#siffar AGAdjINFL ;
guovttečuvddat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guovtte#čuvdd AGAdj "fingered A" ;
guđagearddat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guđa#geardd AGAdj ;
guđastávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:guđa#stávval AGAdjINFL ;
guđegebealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guđege#beal AGAdj ;
gávccioasat+A+Sem/Dummytag:gávcci#oas AGAdj ;
gávpotmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:gávpot#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
hilbesčalmmat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hilbes#čalmm AGAdj ;
iešguđetbealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:ieš#guđet#beal AGAdj ;
iežasmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:iežas#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
islánddagielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:islándda#giel AGAdj ;
juohkejagaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:juohke#jagaž AGAdjINFL ;
jiešguđetivnnat+A+Sem/Dummytag:jieš#guđet#ivnn AGAdj ;
juohkebealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:juohke#beal AGAdj ;
jázzahámat+A+Sem/Dummytag:jázza#hám AGAdj ;
kontráktastávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:kontrákta#stávval AGAdjINFL ;
kymrigielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kymri#giel AGAdj ;
galbmaváimmot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:galbma#váimmog AGAdjINFL ;
luondduvigat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:luonddu#vig AGAdj ;
makkármállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:makkár#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
mangebealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:mange#beal AGAdj ;
miehtemielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:miehte#miel AGAdj ;
minerálavuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:minerála#vuđog AGAdjINFL ;
moattesoarttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:moatte#soartt AGAdj ;
morašmielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:moraš#miel AGAdj ;
muhtunmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:muhtun#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
dássebealat+A+Sem/Dummytag:dásse#beal AGAdj ;
máŋggajagáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:máŋgga#jagáž AGAdjINFL ;
máŋggasearat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:máŋgga#sear AGAdj ;
nirvemuđot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:nirve#muđog AGAdjINFL "cheeked A" ;
njealjejienat+A+Sem/Dummytag:njealje#jien AGAdj ;
njealjeuvssat+A+Sem/Dummytag:njealje#uvss AGAdj "doored A" ;
njealjisiffar+A+Sem/Dummytag:njealji#siffar AGAdjINFL ;
gonagasmielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gonagas#miel AGAdj ;
nuppemállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuppe#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
nuppešlájat+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuppe#šláj AGAdj ;
oarjesámegielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oarje#sáme#giel AGAdj ;
ollolvuloš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ollol#vulož AGAdjINFL ;
ovccičuolmmat+A+Sem/Dummytag:ovcci#čuolmm AGAdj ;
ovddidanguvllot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ovddidan#guvllog AGAdjINFL ;
ovttastávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:ovtta#stávval AGAdjINFL ;
ovttasuorpmat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ovtta#suorpm AGAdj "fingered A" ;
ođđasutmállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:ođđasut#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
rabasvuogat+A+Sem/Dummytag:rabas#vuogag AGAdjINFL ;
roavvafuođarvuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:roavvafuođar#vuđog AGAdjINFL ;
ruksesivnnat+A+Sem/Dummytag:rukses#ivnn AGAdj ;
ránesnađat+A+Sem/Dummytag:ránes#nađ AGAdj ;
ráŋggáštusvuloš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ráŋggáštus#vulož AGAdjINFL ;
ovttasiiddot+A+Sem/Dummytag:ovtta#siiddog AGAdjINFL ;
sinhámat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sin#hám AGAdj ;
suoibmamohkat+A+Sem/Dummytag:suoibma#mohk AGAdj ;
ovttamállet+A+Sem/Dummytag:ovtta#málleg AGAdjINFL ;
unnasorttat+A+Sem/Dummytag:unna#sortt AGAdj ;
viđagearddáš+A+Sem/Dummytag:viđa#gearddáž AGAdjINFL ;
5-stávval+A+Sem/Dummytag:5-stávval AGAdjINFL ;
varraseagat+A+Sem/Dummytag:varra#seag AGAdj ;
vuosttašgielat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuosttaš#giel AGAdj ;
áigeguovdil+A+Sem/Dummytag+Der2+Der/Comp+A+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččabu HEAPMIOBL ;
ásahusvuđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:ásahus#vuđog AGAdjINFL ;
čiežajuvllat+A+Sem/Veh:čieža#juvll AGAdj ;
čáhppesmuđot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čáhppes#muđog AGAdjINFL "cheeked A" ;
čáhppesčalmmat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čáhppes#čalmm AGAdj ;
šattot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:šattog AGAdjINFL "by growth A" ;
heajoslunddot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:heajos#lunddog AGAdjINFL ;
